New York, session 2025-2026, S7792.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section
13.45 to read as follows:
§ 13.45 New York state communication bill of rights for individuals with
disabilities.
In order to ensure that each person with a disability is able to lead
a life of dignity, all persons with a disability shall have the right to
communicate in their preferred manner and all staff and providers under
this section, shall have the obligation to ensure and support such
rights, which shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) the right to utilize any communication method that meets their
needs, including but not limited to:
(1) augmentative and alternative communication (AAC) techniques and
devices;
(2) spelling boards, letterboards and typing-based communication;
(3) sign language and non-verbal gestural systems; and
(4) speech-generating devices or any other assistive technology;
(b) the right to have such individual's communication method recog-
nized and supported in schools, community residences, and public insti-
tutions;
(c) the right to speech therapy and communication support by duly
licensed professionals without arbitrary restrictions;
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD10990-06-5

S. 7792--A 2
(d) the right to have at least one trained staff member available in
every facility or program to support individuals who require specialized
communication assistance;
(e) the right to receive appropriate communication supports from
trained staff, including direct support professionals (DSPs), educators,
and healthcare providers; and
(f) the right to experience no restrictions or bans on an individual
with disabilities' communication method.
§ 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after
it shall have become a law.